Louisiana, session 2026, HB1180.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:931.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§931.1. Life insurance policies; suicide exclusions; limitations; notice requirements
A. A life insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery in this state may
include a suicide exclusion provision; however, no such exclusion shall apply for a
period longer than two years from the date of issue of the policy.
B. Any suicide exclusion shall be stated in clear, conspicuous, and
unambiguous language within the policy. The insurer shall provide written notice
to the policyholder at the time of issuance summarizing the exclusion in plain
language.
C. No life insurer shall deny payment of policy proceeds based on suicide
occurring after the expiration of the two-year exclusion period.
D. An insurer shall not deny payment of life insurance benefits based on the
suicide of the insured when the suicide results from a diagnosed mental health
condition.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2707 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1180
E. Any exclusion permitted in accordance with this Section shall be strictly
construed in favor of coverage. The insurer bears the burden of proving the
applicability of any suicide-related exclusion.
F. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to accidental death and
dismemberment policies.
G. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to a policy issued to insure
the life of a minor.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.